Utah statutes.
49-19-403.   Retirement option.

A governor or legislator may elect to forfeit the allowance provided by this chapter and in lieu thereof participate, on the same basis as other state elected and appointed officers under Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation, in a defined contribution plan administered by the office, in accordance with Section 49-11-801 and in accordance with federal law.



Enacted by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

